trunk/apertium-es-ro/apertium-es-ro.ro.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
<alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÇȘÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏȚÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâășèéêëìíîïțòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
  <!-- Estos són los símbolos usados en catalán, por el momento -->
    <sdef n="detnt"/>
    <sdef n="predet"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="enc"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="mn"/> 
    <sdef n="ac"/>
    <sdef n="vbavea"/>
    <sdef n="pps"/>
    <sdef n="p123"/> 
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="fn"/>
    <sdef n="mfn"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="nn"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="aa"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="aux"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="pper"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="fts"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="dg"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
  </sdefs>

 <pardefs>
  <pardef n="numeros">
    
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
    
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
    
      <e>
        <re>,</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separ">
    
      <e>
        <re>[¿¡]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
    
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
    
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="emails">
      <e>
	<re>[a-z.]+@[a-z.]+</re>
	<p>
	 <l/>
	 <r><s n="num"/></r>
	</p>
     </e>
   </pardef>
   <pardef n="urls">
     <e>
	<re>((www.)[a-z\-]+[.][a-z]+)</re>
	<p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="num"/></r>
	</p>
     </e>
    </pardef>


      <!--PARADIGMA PRONOMS ENC/PROCL-->

<pardef n="S__aducând">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-o</l>
	  <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
</pardef>   

<pardef n="S__aducându-mi">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-l</l>
	  <r>îl<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-o</l>
	  <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-i</l>
	  <r>îi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-le</l>
	  <r>le<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="fn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>  
</pardef>        

<pardef n="S__aducându-ni">     
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-l</l>
	  <r>îl<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-i</l>
	  <r>îi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-le</l>
	  <r>le<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="fn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
	
      </e>  
</pardef>      

  

      <e>
        <par n="separa"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="numeros"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="coma"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="paresq"/>
      </e>
     <e>
        <par n="pardret"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="separ"/>
      </e>
   <e>
      <par n="emails"/>
     </e>
    <e>
      <par n="urls"/>
    </e>
